Utah statutes.
32B-4-408.   Unlawful purchase or acceptance.

(1)  It is unlawful for a person or the person's staff to purchase, take, or accept an alcoholic product from another person, except as provided by this title or the rules of the commission adopted under this title.

(2)  An act is unlawful under Subsection (1) if it is taken:

(a)  directly or indirectly; or

(b)  upon a pretense or device.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

